apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="gl/ippe__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ipp</l>       <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippe</l>      <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippes</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippa</l>      <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippet</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipt</l>       <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipper</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippes</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>app</l>       <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippa</l>      <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippet</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipte</l>      <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippen</l>       <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippet</l>       <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipt</l>         <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippet</l>       <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ipt</l>         <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipne</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>ipn</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippede</l>      <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippete</l>      <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipte</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipne</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippede</l>      <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippete</l>      <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ipte</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippende</l>     <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippa</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippa</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippa</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ippa</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ipping</l>       <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ipper</l>       <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sl/eppe__vblex_adj">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ept</l>       <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppen</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ept</l>       <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epte</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="nno-samsvarsbøying"><p><l>ept</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epte</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>      <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eppende</l>   <r>eppe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>epp</l>       <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eppe</l>      <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eppes</l>     <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ept</l>       <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>epper</l>     <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eppes</l>     <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>app</l>       <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>epte</l>      <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>epping</l>       <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><j/>ing</r></p><par n="då__n"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>epper</l>       <r>eppe<s n="vblex"/><j/>er</r></p><par n="uer__n"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="sleppe">          <i>sl</i><par n="sl/eppe__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="glippe">          <i>gl</i><par n="gl/ippe__vblex_adj"/></e>
